Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1254
State investment officer; operations; report; contents; public inspection.

The state investment officer shall report no later than fifteen days after the close of each month to the Governor, the State Treasurer, the Auditor of Public Accounts, the Department of Administrative Services, and the members of the council on the operations for the pooled accounts during such month. The report shall include a summary of investments, purchases, and dealers utilized. Such reports shall be available for public inspection in the office of the state investment officer.

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 18, p. 2355;

Laws 2003, LB 149, § 4.